trunk/apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="fu/gir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>giríem</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giria</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giríeu</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giries</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>girien</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giria</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>girem</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giré</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gireu</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giràs</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giran</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>girà</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gíssim</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gís</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gíssiu</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gissis</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gissin</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>gís</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gint</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gint</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gírem</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gí</l>        <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gíreu</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gires</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>giren</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gí</l>        <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gim</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gim</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giu</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giu</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gin</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gen</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gin</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gen</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gi</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ja</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gi</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ja</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gir</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gir</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gíem</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gia</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gíeu</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gies</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gien</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gia</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gíssim</l>   <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gírem</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gís</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gira</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gíssiu</l>   <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gíreu</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gissis</l>   <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gires</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gissin</l>   <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>giren</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gís</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>gira</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gides</l>     <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gida</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gits</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>git</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gim</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>jo</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e i="yes" v="val"><p><l>ig</l><r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giu</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gim</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


  <e r="LR"><p><l>giguem</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gi</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ja</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giu</l>       <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gigueu</l>    <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>gis</l>      <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="fugir">           <i>fu</i><par n="fu/gir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="defugir">         <i>defu</i><par n="fu/gir__vblex"/></e>
